Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Chapter 6 Ballots

Cross references. —

For requirement that all elections shall be by ballot, see art. 6, § 11, Wyo. Const.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

26 Am. Jur. 2d Elections §§ 312 to 347.

29 C.J.S. Elections §§ 260 to 307.

§ 22-6-101.
Certification of candidates nominated; printing of names.

Not less than sixty (60) days before each general election the secretary of state shall transmit to each county clerk under party headings a certified list of the name and address of each person nominated by primary election as indicated by the state canvass, the name of each person nominated by provisional or minor party convention, the name of each independent candidate qualifying for nomination by petition, and the office sought. The names of these candidates shall be printed on the official ballot of the general election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-84; Laws 1985, ch. 204, § 1; 1990, ch. 42, § 1; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 2008, ch. 115, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “transmit to each county clerk under party headings a certified list of” for “certify to each county clerk under party headings” in the first sentence.

Laws 2008, ch. 115, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

Stated

in

Populist Party v. Herschler, 746 F.2d 656, 1984 U.S. App. LEXIS 17718 (10th Cir. 1984).

§ 22-6-102.
County clerk to print ballots; exception.

The county clerk shall print official ballots for his county, for all primary, general and special elections.

All other ballots shall be provided by the official responsible for conducting the election.

History:

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-85; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

in the first sentence of (a), deleted “and ballot labels where necessary,” deleted “and,” and inserted “and special”; and deleted the last sentence of (a) which read: “For use on voting machines the county clerk shall print ballot labels in black ink on white material containing the names of candidates or other words required by law.”

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Willis v. Larson, 539 P.2d 352,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1975).

§ 22-6-103.
Official ballots.

The official ballot shall contain the name of every candidate and every ballot proposition lawfully entitled to appear on the ballot. Only official ballots shall be cast at any election.

The official absentee ballot shall be in the form prescribed by law for the official ballot.

History:

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-86; Laws 2004, ch. 94, § 2; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2004 amendment

added (b), redesignating the existing provision as (a).

Laws 2004, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

The 2014 amendment

, deleted “or a reasonable printed reproduction of the prescribed frm for electronic ballots” at the end of (b).

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

§ 22-6-104.
Sample ballots; printing, distribution, posting.

The officer providing the official ballot shall also print sample ballots which shall be identical to the official ballot except that it shall contain the words “SAMPLE” in large clear letters and may be printed on paper of a different color than the official ballot. The officer shall distribute copies of the sample ballot to each polling place prior to opening of the polls. The judges of election shall post at least one (1) copy of the sample in the polling place during the election. The county clerk shall have the samples available in his office for the public.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-87; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015.

The 2014 amendment,

in the first sentence, deleted “or voting machine label,” deleted “or voting machine facsimile,” substituted “SAMPLE” for “SAMPLE BALLOT,” and deleted “or label”; in the second sentence, deleted “or voting machine facsimile”; and in the third sentence, substituted “one (1) copy” for “three (3) copies,” and deleted “and around.”

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2015 amendment,

in the second sentence, substituted “polling place” for “precinct.”

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

§ 22-6-105.
Sample ballots; publication.

The officer providing the official ballots shall publish sample ballots at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the district in which each primary and general election is held within two (2) weeks prior to the election. This notice shall also state that the names of candidates will be rotated on the official ballots and will not always appear in the order indicated in the sample ballots.

History:

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-88; Laws 1979, ch. 133, § 2; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

in the first sentence, deleted “paper,” and deleted “and voting machine facsimiles.”

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2014.

§ 22-6-106.
Replacement of lost ballots.

Official ballots not delivered to a polling place or lost, stolen or destroyed shall be replaced immediately by the official providing the ballot. Judges of election receiving replacement ballots shall sign a receipt therefor in which they shall state under oath, before each other, that the original ballots were not delivered to the precinct or have been lost, stolen or destroyed.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-89; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015.

The 2014 amendment,

deleted “or ballot labels” in the first sentence.

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “polling place” for “precinct.”

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

§ 22-6-107.
Time for possession of ballots and labels.

Official ballots for primary and general elections shall be in the county clerk’s possession forty-five (45) days before the election. If a clerk is unable to obtain ballots on time, the secretary of state shall provide by rule and regulation for the clerk to obtain and use substitute ballots.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, county clerks shall make official absentee ballots for primary and general elections available to voters with rights under the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C. 1973ff, and future acts amendatory or supplemental thereto, forty-five (45) days before the election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-90; Laws 1985, ch. 204, § 1; 1990, ch. 42, § 1; 2007, ch. 39, § 1; 2011, ch. 15, § 1; 2020 ch. 100, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added the last sentence.

The 2011 amendment,

in (a), added the designation, deleted “and labels” following “Official ballots”; and added (b).

Laws 2011, ch. 15 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 17, 2011.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) substituted “forty-five (45) days” for “forty (40) days.”

Stated

in

Populist Party v. Herschler, 746 F.2d 656, 1984 U.S. App. LEXIS 17718 (10th Cir. 1984).

§ 22-6-108.
Errors or omissions; posting.

The official responsible for preparing the ballot shall correct errors or omissions as soon as possible.

The official shall post a copy of each ballot in his office not later than the day when the official must have the ballot in his possession.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-91; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2.

Mandamus. —

In mandamus to state canvassing board where it is alleged relator's name was unlawfully printed upon official ballots, court is obliged to consider incidentally, but not finally, every question affecting propriety of its issuing peremptory writ, without relator's ultimate right to office being determined. State ex rel. Bennett v. Barber, 4 Wyo. 56, 32 P. 14,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1892).

§ 22-6-109.
Elector's petition alleging error or omission.

Not later than three (3) days after the ballot is posted an elector may file a notarized affidavit with the county clerk alleging that an error or omission exists in any official ballot to be voted within the county. The county clerk shall, if the affidavit has merit, correct the error or omission as soon as possible.

Not earlier than three (3) days and not more than six (6) days after filing the notarized affidavit with the county clerk, if the clerk fails to correct the alleged error or omission, the elector may file a petition in district court alleging that an error or omission exists in any official ballot to be voted within the county. The court shall, as soon as practical, order the ballot corrected or dismiss the petition.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-92; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

Cited

in

Karn v. Hayes, 530 P.2d 156,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1975).

§ 22-6-110.
Ballot propositions.

A ballot proposition shall be printed as nearly as possible in the manner and form prescribed by law for a constitutional amendment.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-93.

Cross references. —

As to amendments to constitution, see art. 20, § 1, Wyo. Const., and §§

22-20-101

to

22-20-109

.

§ 22-6-111.
Only name of candidate on ballot; exception.

A candidate may use the name on the ballot by which he is generally known. Professional titles and degrees shall not appear on the ballot. If in the opinion of the officer with whom the application for nomination or election is filed the names of two (2) or more candidates for any office to be voted on at the same election are the same or so similar as to confuse the electors as to the candidates’ identity, the occupation and residence address of each of these candidates shall be printed under the candidate’s name on the ballot.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-94.

§ 22-6-112.
Name to appear only once; exception.

No candidate’s name shall appear on the partisan ballot more than once, except that of a candidate for the office of precinct committeeman or committeewoman, who may also seek the office of president or vice president of the United States or another office on the same partisan primary ballot.

No candidate’s name shall appear on the general election ballot more than once, except that a candidate for a partisan office may also seek the office of president or vice president of the United States or a nonpartisan office on the same general election ballot in accordance with W.S.

22-2-116

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-95; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 2020 ch. 100, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, designated the undesignated paragraph as (a) and substituted “seek the office of president or vice president of the United States or another office” for “seek another office”; and added (b).

§ 22-6-113.
More than 1 ballot on machine.

More than one (1) ballot may appear on a voting machine but if several ballots are placed on a machine they shall be clearly separated to prevent confusion.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-96.

§ 22-6-114.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, related to the prohibition against certain parties, groups or organizations appearing on the election ballot.

§ 22-6-115.
Specifications for paper ballots; arrangements on voting machines.

Official paper ballots shall be uniform in size, printed in black ink on good quality paper through which printing cannot be read. Ballots shall be white except as otherwise provided. On a voting machine each column or row containing the titles of offices and candidates for office shall be arranged to indicate clearly the office for which a candidate is running.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-98.

§ 22-6-116.
Printing type size of party and candidate names.

On official ballots the political party name or title shall be printed in capital letters not less than one-eighth (1/8) inch nor more than one-fourth (1/4) of an inch in height. The names of all candidates shall be printed in the same size letters not less than one-eighth (1/8) inch nor more than one-fourth (1/4) of an inch in height. The name of each political party shall be printed in the same type size as that of every other political party.

History:

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-99; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1997, ch. 40, § 1; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2014 amendment

, in the first sentence, deleted “and ballot labels.”

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2014.

§ 22-6-117.
Order of listing offices in partisan elections.

The major party primary and general partisan election ballots shall contain the offices to be voted on in the following order:

President and vice-president of the United States, or electors therefor, or as otherwise required by an act of congress;

United States senator;

Representative in congress;

Candidates for governor, secretary of state, state auditor, state treasurer, and superintendent of public instruction;

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 1, § 7.

Candidates for state senate;

Candidates for state house of representatives;

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 2.

Candidates for county commissioner, coroner, district attorney, county attorney, sheriff, clerk, treasurer, assessor, and clerk of the district court;

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 115, § 2.

Candidates for precinct offices.

History:

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-100; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1992, ch. 1, §§ 5, 7; 2008, ch. 115, § 2; 2014 ch. 108, §§ 1, 2, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2008 amendment,

repealed (a)(x) which read: “Candidates for offices of county subdivisions.”

Laws 2008, ch. 115, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2014 amendment,

in (a)(ix), inserted “district attorney, county”; and repealed former (a)(viii), which read: “Candidates for district attorney.”

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, §
8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 22-6-118.
Primary ballot colors.

The primary ballot of political parties shall be printed on the following colored paper or on paper with the following color demarcation as provided by rule and regulation of the secretary of state:

Republican party — White;

Democratic party — Blue;

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 5.

Additional major parties — A different color for each major party.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-101; Laws 1991, ch. 243, §§ 2, 5; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2007, ch. 39, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added “or on paper with the following color demarcation as provided by rule and regulation of the secretary of state” in the introductory language in (a).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 22-6-119.
Format of primary ballot.

The primary ballot of each major political party shall be printed in substantial compliance with this format:

Across the top shall be printed “Official Primary Election Ballot” followed by the name of the major political party;

On the first line shall be printed the county in which the ballot is used, the date of the election and blank lines for entry of the election district and precinct;

On the second line shall be printed the following instructions: “To vote for a person whose name is printed on the ballot, mark the square immediately adjacent to the name of the person for whom you desire to vote. To vote for a person whose name is not printed on the ballot, write the person’s name in the blank space provided for that purpose and mark the square immediately adjacent to the name of the person.”;

Candidates for the different offices shall be arranged in separate groups. At the top of each group shall appear the title of the office. Adjacent to the title of the office shall be printed “Vote for one” or if more than one (1) are to be voted for, “Vote for not more than”, then the appropriate words and figures designating the proper number to be elected;

Below the list of candidates in each group shall be printed blank lines for write-in candidates equal in number to the number of candidates to be voted for;

Adjacent to the name of each candidate and blank line shall be printed a square for marking the vote. No square shall appear at the top of a column;

and (viii) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-102; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, §§ 2, 5; 2007, ch. 39, § 1; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2021 ch. 145, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), substituted “adjacent to” for “to the right of” in (i) and (vi); and substituted “Adjacent to the title of the office” for “On the same line and to the right.”

The 2014 amendment,

deleted “Partisan” in (a)(i).

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in the second sentence of (a)(iii), substituted "the person's" for "his."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears on the printed acts.

§ 22-6-120.
Format of general election ballot.

The general election ballot shall be printed in substantial compliance with this format:

Across the top shall be printed “Official General Election Ballot”;

On the first line shall be printed the name of the county in which the ballot is used, the date of the election, and blank lines for entry of the election district and precinct number;

On the second line shall be printed the same instructions as prescribed for primary elections in W.S.

22-6-119

;

The designation of offices and the applicable term of office shall be printed preceding the names of candidates for the office;

and (vi) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

The names of partisan party candidates, if candidates have filed, and independent candidates, if candidates have filed, shall be printed in a separate column or columns, row or rows, and the name of the party represented or the word “Independent” shall be printed directly above the candidate’s name or at the end of the row. If there are a number of candidates representing a party, or independents, the county clerk at his discretion may designate a separate vertical column or columns, or row or rows to said candidates and print the name of said party or the word “Independent” at the top of the column or beginning of the row;

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

For offices to which more than one (1) person is to be elected, the names of candidates in each column running for the office shall be offset or staggered to prevent two (2) names from appearing directly opposite each other;

Below the names of candidates for each office shall be printed blank lines for write-in candidates equal in number to the number of persons to be elected;

Adjacent to the name of each candidate, except those running for the office of president and vice-president of the United States and their electors, and adjacent to each blank line for write-in candidates, shall be printed a square for marking the vote. A single square shall be printed to indicate the vote for candidates for the office of president and vice-president of the United States. No square shall appear at the top of a column;

Adjacent to the description of any office to be filled by more than one (1) candidate shall be printed “Vote For Not More Than”, then the appropriate words and figures designating the proper number to be elected;

Vertical columns containing the names of candidates shall be separated by a blank line one-twelfth inch wide;

The official statement of the ballot proposition shall commence on the next line;

Adjacent to the final line of such statement shall be printed two (2) squares on the same line. Above the first square shall be printed the word “For” and above the second square shall be printed the word “Against”;

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

History:

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-103; Laws 1977, ch. 186, § 2; 1983, ch. 107, § 1; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, §§ 2, 5; 2007, ch. 39, § 1; 2008, ch. 115, § 1; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), substituted “Adjacent to” for “to the right of” in (xi) and (xii) and made a similar change in (xv).

The 2008 amendment,

in (a)(vii), added “if candidates have filed” in the first sentence, added “or row or rows” in the last sentence, added “or beginning of the row” at the end.

Laws 2008, ch. 115, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in the introductory paragraph of (a), deleted “partisan”; and in (a)(i), deleted “Partisan.”

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 22-6-121.
Political party ballot position on general election ballot; order of candidates' names.

Political party position shall be determined on the general election ballot according to the number of votes received by each party within the county for the office of representative in congress at the last preceding general election. The party receiving the highest number of votes shall appear first following the names of the offices to be voted for and other parties shall follow in the order of their respective numbers of such votes. The order of any provisional parties will be drawn by the secretary of state. Any independent candidates shall appear following the last party and shall be listed in alphabetical order, subject to rotation. When more than one (1) candidate is to be elected to a particular office, the names of candidates shall be printed in alphabetical order, subject to rotation, on all ballots for electronic and machine voting systems as defined by W.S.

22-1-102

.

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-104; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, §§ 2, 5; 2007, ch. 39, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted the second to last sentence in (a).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 22-6-122.
Rotation of candidates’ names; equal lines on voting machines.

The names of candidates for each office shall be rotated on all ballots by precinct for all elections. In each county the name of each candidate shall appear substantially an equal number of times at the top, at the bottom, and in each intermediate place. In a voting machine polling place, if candidates for the same office occupy more than one (1) line on the voting machine, the number of names appearing on each line shall be as nearly equal as possible.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-105; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

in the last sentence, substituted “polling place” for “precinct.”

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

§ 22-6-123.
Nonpartisan election ballots and ballot propositions.

Primary and general election ballots for nonpartisan offices and ballot propositions shall be printed on yellow paper or paper with yellow demarcation as provided by rule and regulation of the secretary of state, separate from partisan ballots. They shall contain no political party designations, but otherwise shall conform to the same general requirements for official partisan ballots except as otherwise specifically provided.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-106; Laws 1981, ch. 159, § 1; 2007, ch. 39, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “or paper with yellow demarcation as provided by rule and regulation of the secretary of state.”

§ 22-6-124.
Ballot propositions format.

Following all offices on nonpartisan ballots, ballot propositions shall be printed in the order prescribed by law. The name and official number, if any, of each ballot proposition shall be printed adjacent to the proposition in large letters. Nonpartisan ballots shall contain the same instructions as prescribed for partisan primary election ballots in W.S.

22-6-119

. If the ballot contains a proposed constitutional amendment or other ballot proposition, the instructions shall also include the following: “To vote for or against a proposed constitutional amendment, initiative or referendum, or other ballot proposition, mark the square printed adjacent to the proposition marked ‘For’ or ‘Against’.”

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-107; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 2007, ch. 39, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “adjacent to the proposition” for “at the left margin” in the second sentence, and substituted “adjacent to” for “to the right of” in the last sentence.

§ 22-6-125.
Order of offices and ballot propositions on nonpartisan ballots.

The nonpartisan ballot shall contain the offices and ballot propositions to be voted on in the following order:

Retention of justices of the supreme court;

Retention of district court judges;

Retention of circuit court judges;

Retention of magistrates;

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 2; ch. 94, § 4.

Candidates for municipal offices;

Candidates for community college trustees;

Candidates for school board trustees;

Candidates for special district directors;

Candidates for other offices of county subdivisions;

Constitutional amendments;

Initiative propositions;

Referendum propositions;

Other ballot propositions.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-108; Laws 1979, ch. 133, § 2; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 2; ch. 94, § 4; 2008, ch. 115, § 1.

The 2004 amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment, by ch. 42, § 2, repealed former (a)(v), which read: “Justice of the peace;”.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The second 2004 amendment, by ch. 94, § 4, also repealed former (a)(v).

Laws 2004, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2008 amendment,

inserted present (a)(vi) through (a)(x) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

Laws 2008, ch. 115, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 22-6-126.
Form of nonpartisan ballots.

The official nonpartisan ballot for a general election shall be printed in substantially the following form:

OFFICIAL NONPARTISAN ELECTION BALLOT GENERAL ELECTION County of , Election District , Precinct Date (here print instructions) CANDIDATES FOR PUBLIC OFFICE For Justice(s) of the Supreme Court (Here designate the particular term, such as “regular eight (8) year term”, or the “unexpired term of years”). Shall Justice John Roe be retained in office? Yes
No •
• Shall Justice Richard Roe be retained in office? Yes
No •
• For Judge(s) of the District Court of the Judicial District (Here designate the particular term, such as “regular six (6) year term”, or the “unexpired term of years”). Shall Judge Jane Roe be retained in office? Yes
No •
• Shall Judge Richard Roe be retained in office? Yes
No •
• For Circuit Court Judge (Here designate the particular term, such as “regular four- year term”, or the “unexpired term of years”). Shall Judge John Doe be retained in office? Yes
No •
• Shall Judge Richard Roe be retained in office? Yes
No •
• For Magistrate (Here designate the particular term, such as “regular four (4) year term”, or the “unexpired term of years”). Shall Magistrate John Doe be retained in office? Yes No •
• Shall Magistrate Richard Roe be retained in office? Yes No •
• Align all designations of office to correspond on the ballot with the listing of names of candidates for the proper office and term. BALLOT PROPOSITIONS Proposed Constitutional Amendment Letter A: For
Against (Ballot Statement) •
•
Proposed Initiative Proposition Number One: For
Against (Ballot Statement) •
•
Proposed Referendum Proposition Number One: For
Against (Ballot Statement) •
•
Other Ballot Propositions: For
Against (Ballot Statement For Each Proposition) •
•

Click to view

The official nonpartisan ballot for a primary election shall be so identified in the title and shall omit all references to justices of the supreme court, judges of the district court and circuit court judges but otherwise shall be in the same form as the general election nonpartisan ballot.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-109; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 1979, ch. 133, § 2; 1995, ch. 115, § 1; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; ch. 94, § 2.

The 2004 amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment, by ch. 42, § 1, in (a), deleted the provisions pertaining to the justice of the peace.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The second 2004 amendment, by ch. 94, § 2, also deleted the provisions pertaining to the justice of the peace.

Laws 2004, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Ousting the Judge: Campaign Politics in the 1984 Wyoming Judicial Retention Elections,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 371 (1989).

§ 22-6-127.
Rotation of names on nonpartisan ballots.

The names of candidates for each nonpartisan office shall be rotated on the ballot in the same manner as required by law for candidates for partisan office.

Rotation is not necessary if the number of candidates is equal to or less than the number of seats up for election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-110; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2.

§ 22-6-128.
Ballots for other elections.

At the county clerk’s discretion, separate ballots for bond, school and community college districts, and special district elections may be required and shall be provided by the authority responsible for holding the election. Ballots shall conform as nearly as possible to general requirements specified by law for the general election ballot, except as otherwise specifically provided.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-111; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to bond elections, see §§

22-21-101

to

22-21-112

.

As to school elections, see §§

22-22-101

to

22-22-304

.

§ 22-6-129.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 115, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which was derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-112; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2, related to the number of ballots to be provided.